src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON	_N4431

 ! non possessive forms

+N+Sg+Nom:ын K ;
+N+Sg+Loc:ынт K ;
+N+Sg+Lat:нын K ;
+N+Sg+Abl:ынныл K ;
+N+Sg+Instr:ныл K ;
+N+Sg+Trans:ныг K ;

+N+Du+Nom:ныг K ;
+N+Du+Loc:ныгт K ;
+N+Du+Lat:ныгн K ;
+N+Du+Abl:ныгныл K ;
+N+Du+Instr:ныгтыл K ;

+N+Pl+Nom:ныт K ;
+N+Pl+Loc:нытт K ;
+N+Pl+Lat:нытн K ;

+N+Pl+Lat:нытын K ;
+N+Pl+Abl:нытныл K ;
+N+Pl+Instr:нытыл K ;

 ! possessive forms

+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom:нум K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc:нумт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat:нумн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl:нумныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Instr:нумтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom:нагум K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc:нагумт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat:нагумн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Abl:нагумныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Instr:нагумтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom:нанум K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc:нанумт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat:нанумн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl:нанумныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Instr:нанумтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom:нын K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc:нынт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat:нынн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl:нынныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Instr:нынтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom:нагын K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc:нагынт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat:нагынн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Abl:нагынныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Instr:нагынтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:нан K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:нант K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:нанн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:нанныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:нантыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:нанын K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:нанынт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:нанынн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:нанынныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:нанынтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom:нэ K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc:нэт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat:нэн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl:нэныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Instr:нэтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom:наге K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc:нагет K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat:наген K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Abl:нагеныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Instr:нагетыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom:нанэ K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc:нанэт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat:нанэн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl:нанэныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Instr:нанэтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom:ынме̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc:ынме̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat:ынме̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Abl:ынме̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Instr:ынме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom:нагме̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc:нагме̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat:нагме̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Abl:нагме̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Instr:нагме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom:нанме̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc:нанме̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat:нанме̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Abl:нанме̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Instr:нанме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom:нын K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc:нынт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat:нынн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Abl:нынныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Instr:нынтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom:нагы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc:нагы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat:нагы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Abl:нагы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Instr:нагы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:наны̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:наны̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:наны̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:наны̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:наны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:нан K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:нант K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:нанн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:нанныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:нантыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom:нэн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc:нэнт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat:нэнн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Abl:нэнныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Instr:нэнтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom:наге̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc:наге̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat:наге̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Abl:наге̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Instr:наге̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom:нанэн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc:нанэнт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat:нанэнн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Abl:нанэнныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Instr:нанэнтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom:нув K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc:нувт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat:нувн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl:нувныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Instr:нувтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom:нагув K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc:нагувт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat:нагувн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Abl:нагувныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Instr:нагувтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom:нанув K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc:нанувт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat:нанувн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl:нанувныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Instr:нанувтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom:ны̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc:ны̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat:ны̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl:ны̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Instr:ны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom:нагы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc:нагы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat:нагы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Abl:нагы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Instr:нагы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:наны̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:наны̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:наны̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:наны̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:наны̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:нан K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:нант K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:нанн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:нанныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:нантыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom:наныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc:нанылт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat:нанылн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl:нанылныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Instr:нанылтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom:нага̄ныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc:нага̄нылт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat:нага̄нылн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Abl:нага̄нылныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Instr:нага̄нылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:нананыл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:нананылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:нананылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:нананылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:нананылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:на̄ныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:на̄нылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:на̄нылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:на̄нылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:на̄нылтыл K ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
