src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
ва̄нын:ва̄н	_N4431	"плечо" ;
ва̄ӈын:ва̄ӈ	_N4431	"плечо" ;
лэ̄ӈын:лэ̄ӈ	_N4431	"белка" ;
лэ̄ӈын:лэ̄ӈ	_N4431	"белка" ;
пӯӈын:пӯӈ	_N4431	"богатый" ;
эӈын:эӈ	_N4431	"подбородок" ;
э̄ӈын:э̄ӈ	_N4431	"подбородок" ;
